Utah statutes.
16-16-805.   Term of director.

(1)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, and subject to Subsections (3) and (4) and Subsection 16-16-303(3), the term of a director expires at the annual members meeting following the director's election or appointment.  The term of a director may not exceed three years.

(2)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a director may be reelected.

(3)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (4), a director continues to serve until a successor director is elected or appointed and qualifies or the director is removed, resigns, is adjudged incompetent, or dies.

(4)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a director does not serve the remainder of the director's term if the director ceases to qualify to be a director.



Enacted by Chapter 363, 2008 General Session

